New York, session 2025-2026, A9632.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 20-d of section 3 of the alcoholic beverage 2 control law, as amended by chapter 326 of the laws of 2022, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 20-d. "New York state labelled beer" means[: 5 (a) from the effective date of this subdivision until December thir- 6 ty-first, two thousand eighteen, beer made with no less than twenty 7 percent, by weight, of its hops grown in New York state and no less than 8 twenty percent, by weight, of all of its other ingredients, excluding 9 water, grown in New York state; 10 (b) from January first, two thousand nineteen until December thirty- 11 first, two thousand twenty-eight, beer made with no less than sixty 12 percent, by weight, of its hops grown in New York state and no less than 13 sixty percent, by weight, of all of its other ingredients, excluding 14 water, grown in New York state; and 15 (c) from January first, two thousand twenty-nine and thereafter, beer 16 made with no less than ninety percent, by weight, of its hops grown in 17 New York state and no less than ninety percent, by weight, of all of its 18 other ingredients, excluding water, grown in New York state] beer made 19 with no less than sixty percent, by weight, of its hops grown in New 20 York state and no less than sixty percent, by weight, of all of its 21 other ingredients, excluding water, grown in New York state. 22 § 2. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 11 of section 51-a of the alcoholic 23 beverage control law, as added by chapter 108 of the laws of 2012, is 24 amended to read as follows: 25 (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subdivision, [no 26 licensed farm brewery shall manufacture or sell any beer other than New 27 York state labelled beer] a licensed farm brewery shall manufacture or 28 sell New York state labelled beer and may manufacture or sell beer other EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14367-01-6 A. 9632 2 1 than New York state labelled beer that the licensee has manufactured; 2 provided that the total aggregate of hops used by the farm brewer licen- 3 see in all its brewing is no less than sixty percent by weight grown in 4 New York state and that the total aggregate use of other ingredients, 5 except water, used by the farm brewer licensee in all its brewing is no 6 less than sixty percent by weight grown in New York state. 7 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 8 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 9 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 10 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 11 completed on or before such effective date.